test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_konaas_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikonaasensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikonaasensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikonaasensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gikonaasenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gikonaasenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gikonaasenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gikonaasensimishiniibaning
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gikonaasensimishiniibanan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gikonaasensimishiniibanag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: okonaasenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: okonaasenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: okonaasenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: okonaasenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: okonaasenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: okonaasenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: okonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: okonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: okonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: okonaasenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: okonaasenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: okonaasenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: okonaasensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: okonaasensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: okonaasensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: okonaasensimishiniibaning
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: okonaasensimishiniibanan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: okonaasensimishiniibanag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: okonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: okonaasensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: okonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: okonaasensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: okonaasensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: okonaasensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikonaasenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikonaasenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikonaasenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikonaasensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikonaasensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikonaasensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
